Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.045, is amended to read: 18B.045 PESTICIDE MANAGEMENT PLAN. Subdivision 1. Development. The commissioner shall develop a pesticide management plan for the prevention, evaluation, and mitigation of occurrences of pesticidesnew text begin , pesticides from treated seed,new text end or pesticide breakdown products in groundwaters and surface waters of the state. The pesticide management plan must include components promoting prevention, developing appropriate responses to the detection of pesticidesnew text begin , pesticides from treated seed,new text end or pesticide breakdown products in groundwater and surface waters, and providing responses to reduce or eliminate continued pesticide movement to groundwater and surface water. By September 1 of each even-numbered year, the commissioner must submit a status report on the plan to the Environmental Quality Board for review and then to the house of representatives and senate committees with jurisdiction over the environment, natural resources, and agriculture. Subd. 2. Coordination. The pesticide management plan shall be coordinated and developed with other state agency plans and with other state agencies new text begin and local units of government new text end through the Environmental Quality Board. In addition, new text begin public health agencies, new text end the University of Minnesota Extension Service, farm organizations, farmers, environmental organizations, and industry shall be involved in the pesticide management plan development. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18B.10, is amended to read: 18B.10 ACTION TO PREVENT GROUNDWATER CONTAMINATION. (a) The commissioner may, by rule, special order, or delegation through written regulatory agreement with officials of other approved agencies, take action necessary to prevent the contamination of groundwater resulting from leaching of pesticides through the soil, from the backsiphoning or backflowing of pesticides through water wells, or from the direct flowage of pesticides to groundwater. (b) With owner consent, the commissioner may deleted text begin usedeleted text end new text begin samplenew text end private water wells throughout the state to monitor for the presence of deleted text begin agriculturaldeleted text end pesticidesnew text begin , pesticides from treated seed, pesticide breakdown products,new text end and other deleted text begin industrialdeleted text end chemicals in groundwater. The specific locations and land owners shall not be identifiable. The owner or user of a private water well sampled by the commissioner must be given access to test results. Sec. 3. new text begin [18B.102] ACTION TO PREVENT SURFACE WATER CONTAMINATION. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may by rule, special order, or delegation through written regulatory agreement with officials of other approved agencies, take action necessary to prevent the contamination of surface water resulting from pesticides, pesticides from treated seed, or pesticide breakdown products from soil erosion, improper disposal or use, or direct flowage. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may sample public waters to monitor for the presence of pesticides, pesticides from treated seed, pesticide-treated products, pesticide breakdown products, and other chemicals in surface waters. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [18B.105] ACTION TO PREVENT AIR QUALITY CONTAMINATION. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may by rule, special order, or delegation through written regulatory agreement with officials of other approved agencies, take action necessary to prevent the contamination of air by pesticides, pesticides from treated seed, or pesticide breakdown products from drift, evaporation, volatilization, wind erosion, or any other source. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may sample ambient air to monitor for the presence of pesticides, pesticides from treated seed, and pesticide-treated products. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18D.40, is amended to read: 18D.40 ENHANCED PENALTIES; OUTDOOR RECREATION LANDS. Notwithstanding limitations placed on administrative or civil penalty amounts under sections 18D.315 and 18D.325, a person who applies a pesticide new text begin or plants seed treated with pesticide new text end resulting in damage to adjacent property that is part of the state outdoor recreation system may be subject to a monetary penalty equal to twice the amount that the commissioner would otherwise assess for a comparable violation. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 21.81, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 35. new text end new text begin Systemic pesticide. new text end new text begin "Systemic pesticide" means a pesticide designed to be absorbed by plants and translocated throughout plant tissue. Systemic pesticides include: new text end new text begin (1) acetamiprid, dinotefuran, clothianidin, thiamethoxam, imidacloprid, nitenpyram, thiacloprid, fipronil, flupyradifurone, sulfoxaflor, cyantraniliprole, or chlorantraniliprole; and new text end new text begin (2) any other pesticide determined by the commissioner to be a systemic pesticide, pursuant to section 21.917. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 21.82, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Treated seed. For all named agricultural, vegetable, flower, or wildflower seeds which are treated, for which a separate label may be used, the label must contain: (1) a word or statement to indicate that the seed has been treated; (2) the commonly accepted, coined, chemical, or abbreviated generic chemical name of the applied substance; (3) the caution statement "Do not use for food, feed, or oil purposes" if the substance in the amount present with the seed is harmful to human or other vertebrate animals; (4) in the case of mercurials or similarly toxic substances, a poison statement and symbol; (5) a word or statement describing the process used when the treatment is not of pesticide origin; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (6) the date beyond which the inoculant is considered ineffective if the seed is treated with an inoculant. It must be listed on the label as "inoculant: expires (month and year)" or wording that conveys the same meaningdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (7) the caution statement for any corn or soybean seed treated with a neonicotinoid pesticide, framed in a box and including a bee icon developed by the commissioner that states: "Planting seed treated with a neonicotinoid pesticide may negatively impact pollinator health. Please use care when handling and planting this seed." new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [21.917] SYSTEMIC PESTICIDE-TREATED SEED PROGRAM. new text end new text begin By January 1, 2027, the commissioner must develop a program for the regulation of systemic pesticide-treated seed and: new text end new text begin (1) account for the total quantity of systemic pesticide-treated seed purchased and used in the state, and the total acreage and location where systemic pesticide-treated seed is applied each year; new text end new text begin (2) ensure that all treated seed used in the state is subject to any regulatory restrictions necessary to protect human health and the environment, including but not limited to pollinating insects, birds, and aquatic ecosystems, from exposure to systemic insecticides; new text end new text begin (3) require formal verification of need prior to the use of systemic pesticide-treated seed except where systemic pesticide-treated seed is the only commercially available option. At a minimum, the commissioner must require written certification from a trained and approved individual for each use of systemic pesticide-treated field crop seed, verifying that, for the time and location, the use would be effective in addressing a demonstrable pest problem; new text end new text begin (4) study the use, efficacy, and environmental and health impacts of systemic pesticide-treated seed in the state; new text end new text begin (5) develop and disseminate educational materials and best management practices for the use of systemic pesticide-treated seed; new text end new text begin (6) collaborate with the University of Minnesota in developing and implementing the systemic pesticide-treated seed program. This collaboration may include the evaluation of national and international research on treated seed for its applicability to Minnesota-specific conditions to ensure a sound understanding of efficacy of seed treatment rates, scouting techniques, pest pressures, economic thresholds, and planting-technology differences; and new text end new text begin (7) designate any pesticide, including but not limited to any chemical belonging to the neonicotinoid or anthranilcil diamide class, to be a systemic pesticide. The commissioner must maintain a list of pesticides designated to be a systemic pesticide on the agency's public website. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [21.93] SYSTEMIC PESTICIDE-TREATED SEED ALTERNATIVES ACCOUNT. new text end new text begin The systemic pesticide-treated seed alternatives account is established in the agricultural fund. Money in the account, including interest, is appropriated to the University of Minnesota for research and outreach regarding nonchemical pest prevention methods that may serve as an alternative to the use of systemic pesticide-treated seed. This money may be used to award competitive grants. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SYSTEMIC PESTICIDE-TREATED SEED PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the pesticide regulatory account in the agricultural fund to the commissioner of agriculture to implement the systemic pesticide-treated seed program. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SYSTEMIC PESTICIDE-TREATED SEED ALTERNATIVES ACCOUNT.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the pesticide regulatory account in the agricultural fund to the systemic pesticide-treated seed alternatives account. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end